Hawaii statutes.
§444-7 Classification. (a) For the
purpose of classification, the contracting business includes any or all of the
following branches:

(1) General engineering contracting;

(2) General building contracting;

(3) Specialty contracting.

(b) A general engineering contractor is a
contractor whose principal contracting business is in connection with fixed
works requiring specialized engineering knowledge and skill, including the
following divisions or subjects: irrigation, drainage, water power, water supply,
flood control, inland waterways, harbors, docks and wharves, shipyards and
ports, dams and hydroelectric projects, levees, river control and reclamation
works, railroads, highways, streets and roads, tunnels, airports and airways,
sewers and sewage disposal plants and systems, waste reduction plants, bridges,
overpasses, underpasses and other similar works, pipelines and other systems
for the transmission of petroleum and other liquid or gaseous substances,
parks, playgrounds and other recreational works, refineries, chemical plants
and similar industrial plants requiring specialized engineering knowledge and
skill, powerhouses, power plants and other utility plants and installations,
mines and metallurgical plants, land levelling and earth-moving projects,
excavating, grading, trenching, paving and surfacing work and cement and
concrete works in connection with the above mentioned fixed works.

(c) A general building contractor is a
contractor whose principal contracting business is in connection with any
structure built, being built, or to be built, for the support, shelter, and
enclosure of persons, animals, chattels, or movable property of any kind,
requiring in its construction the use of more than two unrelated building
trades or crafts, or to do or superintend the whole or any part thereof.

(d) A specialty contractor is a contractor
whose operations as such are the performance of construction work requiring
special skill such as, but not limited to, electrical, drywall, painting and
decorating, landscaping, flooring, carpet laying by any installation method,
plumbing, or roofing work, and others whose principal contracting business
involves the use of specialized building trades or crafts. [L 1957, c 305, §1(s
6); Supp, §166A-6; HRS §444-7; am L 1989, c 162, §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next